Wyoming, session 2025, HB0063.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-133 and 18-2-117 are created to
read:

15-1-133. Working animal protections.

(a) No city or town shall enact an ordinance or
policy that terminates, bans or unduly restricts a person
HB0063

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0508
from using a working animal in lawful commerce or an animal
enterprise.

(b) This section supersedes any municipal ordinance
or policy that conflicts with this section, but shall not
supersede:

(i) Any municipal zoning ordinance enacted under
this title;

(ii) Any municipal ordinance or policy relating
to public health or public safety.

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to amend
any other Wyoming law that relates to animal care, public
health or public safety, including the provisions of W.S.
23-3-109.

(d) As used in this section, "working animal" means a
nonhuman animal used primarily for the purpose of
performing a specific duty or function in commerce or an
animal enterprise including human service, legal hunting,
agriculture, ranching, husbandry, transportation,
HB0063

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0508
education, competition, tourism, entertainment or
exhibition. The term shall not include rabbits, llamas,
cattle, swine, sheep, goats, poultry or any other animal
that is used primarily for the production of food or fiber.

18-2-117. Working animal protections.

(a) No county shall enact any resolution, ordinance
or policy that terminates, bans or unduly restricts a
person from using a working animal in lawful commerce or an
animal enterprise.

(b) This section supersedes any resolution, ordinance
or policy that conflicts with this section, but shall not
supersede:

(i) Any county zoning resolution enacted under
this title;

(ii) Any policy relating to public health or
public safety.

HB0063

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0508
(c) This section shall not be interpreted to amend
any other Wyoming law that relates to animal care, public
health or public safety, including the provisions of W.S.
23-3-109.

(d) As used in this section, "working animal" means a
nonhuman animal used primarily for the purpose of
performing a specific duty or function in commerce or an
animal enterprise including human service, legal hunting,
agriculture, ranching, husbandry, transportation,
education, competition, tourism, entertainment or
exhibition. The term shall not include rabbits, llamas,
cattle, swine, sheep, goats, poultry or any other animal
that is used primarily for the production of food or fiber.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0063